src/morphology/stems/numeral.lexc
LEXICON NUM_51kahdestredekiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittatredekiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltatredekiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillatredekiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletredekiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetredekiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistatredekiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinatredekiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientredekiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintredekiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissatredekiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintredekiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettredekiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiatredekiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitredekiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettatredekiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltatredekiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellatredekiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletredekiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestatredekiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenatredekiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentredekiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentredekiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessatredekiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stredekiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttatredekiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitredekiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdestredekiljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittatredekiljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltatredekiljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillatredekiljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletredekiljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetredekiljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistatredekiljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinatredekiljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientredekiljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintredekiljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissatredekiljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintredekiljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettredekiljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiatredekiljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitredekiljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettatredekiljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltatredekiljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellatredekiljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletredekiljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestatredekiljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenatredekiljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentredekiljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentredekiljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessatredekiljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stredekiljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttatredekiljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitredekiljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdestriljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittatriljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltatriljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillatriljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletriljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetriljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistatriljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinatriljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientriljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintriljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissatriljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintriljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettriljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiatriljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitriljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettatriljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltatriljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellatriljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletriljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestatriljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenatriljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentriljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentriljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessatriljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:striljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttatriljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitriljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdestriljoonas

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittatriljoonansitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltatriljoonansilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillatriljoonansilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletriljoonansille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetriljoonansine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistatriljoonansista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinatriljoonansina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientriljoonansien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintriljoonansiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissatriljoonansissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintriljoonansin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettriljoonannet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiatriljoonansia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitriljoonansiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettatriljoonannetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltatriljoonannelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellatriljoonannella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletriljoonannelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestatriljoonannesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenatriljoonantena  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentriljoonannen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentriljoonanteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessatriljoonannessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:striljoonas  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttatriljoonatta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitriljoonanneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;


LEXICON NUM_51kahdestsiljardis

+Ord+Pl+Abe:nsittatsiljardinsitta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Abl:nsiltatsiljardinsilta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ade:nsillatsiljardinsilla  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+All:nsilletsiljardinsille  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Com:nsinetsiljardinsine  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ela:nsistatsiljardinsista  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ess:nsinatsiljardinsina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Gen:nsientsiljardinsien  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ill:nsiintsiljardinsiin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ine:nsissatsiljardinsissa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Ins:nsintsiljardinsin  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Nom:nnettsiljardinnet  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Par:nsiatsiljardinsia  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Pl+Tra:nsiksitsiljardinsiksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abe:nnettatsiljardinnetta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Abl:nneltatsiljardinnelta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ade:nnellatsiljardinnella  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+All:nnelletsiljardinnelle  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ela:nnestatsiljardinnesta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ess:ntenatsiljardina  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Gen:nnentsiljardinnen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ill:nteentsiljardinteen  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Ine:nnessatsiljardinnessa  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Nom:stsiljardis  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Par:ttatsiljarditta  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

+Ord+Sg+Tra:nneksitsiljardinneksi  NUM_BACK_CLIT_OPT  ;

LEXICON NUMERAL
kahdestredekiljardis+Num:kahde  NUM_51kahdestredekiljardis  ;
kahdestredekiljoonas+Num:kahde  NUM_51kahdestredekiljoonas  ;
kahdestriljardis+Num:kahde  NUM_51kahdestriljardis  ;
kahdestriljoonas+Num:kahde  NUM_51kahdestriljoonas  ;
kahdestsiljardis+Num:kahde  NUM_51kahdestsiljardis  ;
